test/src/morphology/V-lwpma49_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `lõpma: # Verb (49) `lõpma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     `lõpma+V+Inf/mA: `lõpma
     `lõpma+V+Inf: lõppõq
     `lõpma+V+ActPrtPrc: `lõpnuq
     `lõpma+V+PssPrtPrc: lõpõt
     `lõpma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: lõpõ
     `lõpma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: lõpõs
     `lõpma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: lõppi
     `lõpma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: lõppi
